apertium-uum.uum.twol
 Alphabet
 А Б В Г Ґ Ғ Д Е Ё Ж Җ З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ӧ Θ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы і Ї Э Ц ʼ
 а б в г ґ ғ д е ё ж җ з и й к л м н ң о ӧ θ п р с т у ӱ ф х ч ш щ ь ы І ї э ц 
 %>:0

 ! Vowel Harmonies
 ! A is English
 %{A%}:е %{A%}:а
 %{a%}:е %{a%}:а %{a%}:0
 %{Е%}:й %{Е%}:а %{Е%}:е
 %{Э%}:э %{Э%}:а  
 ! I/i is English
 %{i%}:ы %{i%}:у %{i%}:и %{i%}:ӱ %{i%}:0 
 %{I%}:ы %{I%}:у %{I%}:и %{I%}:ӱ 

 ! Consonant Harmonies
 %{ь%}:ь %{ь%}:0
 %{й%}:й %{й%}:0
 %{д%}:д %{д%}:т %{д%}:0 
 %{Д%}:д %{Д%}:т
 %{н%}:н %{н%}:0
 %{у%}:у %{у%}:0
 %{ӱ%}:ӱ %{ӱ%}:0
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
 ! C is english
 %{c%}:с %{c%}:0 ! %{c%}:з
 %{з%}:с %{з%}:з
 %{х%}:ғ %{х%}:х 
 %{к%}:г %{к%}:к %{к%}:x
 %{п%}:п %{п%}:б 
 %{г%}:г %{г%}:ғ
 %{ш%}:ш %{ш%}:0

 ! Plural "nasal" harmony
 %{Л%}:л %{Л%}:н
 ! for words like чобан - чобаллара
 %{л%}:л
;

Sets

Consonant = Б В Г Ґ Ғ Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Θ Х Ч Ш Щ Ь Ц ʼ
            б в г ґ ғ д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф θ х ч ш щ ь ц ; 

Vowel = а е э і о ӧ у ӱ ы и
        А Е Э І О Ӧ У Ӱ Ы И ;

Low = А О У Ы
      а о у ы ;

High = Э И Ӧ Ӱ Е
       э и ӧ ӱ е ;

Rounded = О У Ӧ Ӱ
          о у ӧ ӱ ;

Unrounded = А Э Ы И Е
            а э ы и е ;

Voiced = Б В Д Ғ З Ж Г Ґ Й Л Ң Р А Е Э І О Ӧ У Ӱ Ы И М Н
         б в д ғ з ж г ґ й л ң р а е э і о ӧ y ӱ ы и м н ;

Unvoiced = С Т К П Ф Θ Х Ч Ш Щ Ц ʼ
           с т к п ф θ х ч ш щ ц ;

Nasal = М Н
        м н ;

Silent = Ь 
         ь ; 

! ------------ !

Rules

! Rules for First Case: {A} and {Э}

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:Vy => [ :LastVowel :Consonant* ]/:0* _ ;
        where 
            LastVowel in ( э и ӧ ӱ е Э И Ӧ Ӱ Е а о у ы А О У Ы )
                   Vy in ( е е е е е е е е е е а а а а а а а а )  
            
            matched;

"{Э} maps to 'э' after a front vowel"
%{Э%}:э <=> [ :High :Consonant* ]/:0*  _ ;

"Vowel harmony for sub-archiphoneme {a}"
%{a%}:Vy => [ :LastVowel :Consonant* :Consonant ]/[ :0 - %{a%}: ]* _ ;
        where 
            LastVowel in ( а ы А Ы о у О У э и е Э И Е ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ )
                   Vy in ( а а а а а а а а е е е е е е е е е е )  
            matched;

"Additional vowel harmony case for sub-archiphoneme {a} -> 0"
%{a%}:0 <=> [ :Vowel ] %>: _ ;
            [ [ :Vowel - %{у%}: ] :Consonant ]/:0* _ [ :Consonant :Vowel ]/:0* .#. ;

"Vowel harmony for sub-archiphoneme {Е}"
%{Е%}:Vy => [ :LastVowel :Consonant* :Consonant ]/[ :0 - %{Е%}: ]* _ ;
        where 
            LastVowel in ( а ы А Ы о у О У э и е Э И Е ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ )
                   Vy in ( а а а а а а а а е е е е е е е е е е )  
            matched;

"Additional vowel harmony case for sub-archiphoneme {Е} -> й"
%{Е%}:й <=> [ :Vowel ] %>: _ ;
            [ [ :Vowel - %{у%}: ] :Consonant ]/:0* _ [ :Consonant :Vowel ]/:0* ;


! ------------ !

! Rules for Second Case: {i} and {I}

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
%{I%}:Vy => [ :LastVowel :Consonant* ]/:0* _ ;
        where 
            LastVowel in ( а ы А Ы о у О У э и е Э И Е ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ )
                   Vy in ( ы ы ы ы у у у у и и и и и и ӱ ӱ ӱ ӱ )  
            matched;

"Additional vowel harmony case for sub-archiphoneme {I} -> 0"
%{I%}:0 <=> %>: %{c%}: _ %{н%}: %>: %{й%}: %{I%}: .#. ;
            %>: %{c%}: _ %{н%}: %>: %{д%}: %{Э%}: .#. ;
            %>: %{c%}: _ %{н%}: %>: %{й%}: %{A%}: .#. ;

"Vowel harmony for sub-archiphoneme {i}"
%{i%}:Vy => [ :LastVowel :Consonant* :Consonant ]/[ :0 - %{i%}: ]* _ ;
        where 
            LastVowel in ( а ы А Ы о у О У э и е Э И Е ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ )
                   Vy in ( ы ы ы ы у у у у и и и и и и ӱ ӱ ӱ ӱ )  
            matched;

"Additional vowel harmony case for sub-archiphoneme {i} -> 0"
%{i%}:0 <=> [ :Vowel ] %>: _ ;
            [ [ :Vowel - %{у%}: ] :Consonant ]/:0* _ [ :Consonant :Vowel ]/:0* .#. ;

!@ х о й >:0 {i}:у р c {I}:у н 
!@ с а б а >:0 {c}:с {I}:0 {н}:н >:0 {д}:0 {Э}:а
!@ а л т ы н >:0 {i}:0 м >:0 {д}:0 {Э}:а  
!@ х:х о:о о:о н:н ш:ш у:у >:0 {i}:0 м:м >:0 {н}:0 {I}:у н:н
!@ э:э в:в >:0 {н}:0 {I}:и н:н

!@ э:э в:в >:0 {i}:0 м:м >:0 {A}:е
!@ о:о т:т {у}:0 р:р >:0 {i}:у й:й {I}:у м:м
!@ о:о т:т {у}:у р:р >:0 {д}:д {I}:у м:м

! ------------ !

! Other Rules

! ISSUE: This is the same issue as below.
"{ь} maps to 0 before consonant"
%{ь%}:0 => _ :Consonant* ;

"If lemma ends at м, н, then {Л} -> н"
%{Л%}:н <=> :Rounded [ м: | н: ] %>: _ ;

"н realizes as 'л' when preceding %{л%}"
н:л <=> _ %>: %{л%}:л ;

"к, х, п change to  г, ғ, б before a vowel-starting suffix"
! not before тӱркӱ:тӱрк<n><acc>
Cx:Cy <=> _ >: :0* :Unrounded ;
     where 
         Cx in ( к х п )
         Cy in ( г ғ б )
        matched;

"{г} realizes as ғ when before а"
%{г%}:ғ <=> :а _ ;

"{г} realizes as г before е"
%{г%}:г <=> :е _ ;

"{ш} realizes as 0 before consonant"
%{ш%}:0 <=> :Consonant %>: _ ;

"{k} realizes as x after y or ы"
%{к%}:х <=> [ :у | :ы ] :0* _ ;

"{k} realizes as k in other cases"
%{к%}:к <=> [ :а | :и | :е | :э ] :0* _ ;

"{у} gets realized as 0 when a suffix starting with a vowel is added otru"
%{у%}:0 <=> _ [ :Consonant :Vowel ]/:0* ;

"{ӱ} gets realized as 0 when a suffix starting with a vowel follows"
%{ӱ%}:0 <=> _ [ :Consonant :Vowel ]/:0* ;

! rules for possession + locative
"{c} gets realized when after a vowel"
%{c%}:с <=> :Vowel %>: _ ;

!"{й} gets realized as 'й' when preceding vowel"
!%{й%}:й <=> [ :Vowel ] %>: _ ;

"{й} gets realized as '0' when preceding consonant"
%{й%}:0 <=> [ :Consonant - %{н%}: ] %>: _ ;
            %{н%}: %>: _ ;

"{д} gets realized as 'д' when preceding voiced"
%{д%}:д <=> [ :Voiced :Silent* ] %>: _ ;
        except
            [ %{i%}: | %{I%}: ] [ м: | н: | %{н%}: ] %>: _ %{Э%}: .#. ;

"{д} gets realized as 'т' when preceding unvoiced"
%{д%}:т <=> [ :Unvoiced ] %>: _ ;

"{з} gets realized as 'з' when preceding a vowel"
%{з%}:з => _ %>: :Vowel ;

"{д} gets realized as '0' when following this environment"
%{д%}:0 <=> [ %{i%}: | %{I%}: ] [ м: | н: | %{н%}: ] %>: _ %{Э%}: .#. ;

"{н}:0 when end of word"
%{н%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;
            _ %>: :0* :н ;  

! TO DO: "High vowel realizes as  0 if before Consonant and Vowel"
! High:0 <=> _ :Consonant :Vowel ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
